Oklahoma, session 2026, SB899.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.2, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 305, O.S.L. 2023 (22 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 60.2), is amended to read as follows:


Section 60.2. A. A victim of domestic abuse, a victim of


stalking, a victim of harassment, a victim of rape, any adult or


emancipated minor household member on behalf of any other family or


household member who is a minor or incompetent, any minor age


sixteen (16) or seventeen (17) years, or any adult victim of a crime

Req. No. 347 Page 1


may seek relief under the provisions of the Protection from Domestic


Abuse Act.


1. The person seeking relief may file a petition for a


protective order with the district court in the county in which the


victim resides, the county in which the defendant resides, or the


county in which the domestic violence occurred. If the person


seeking relief is not a family or household member or an individual


who is or has been in a dating relationship with the defendant, the


person seeking relief must file a complaint against the defendant


with the proper law enforcement agency before filing a petition for


a protective order with the district court. The person seeking


relief shall provide a copy of the complaint that was filed with the


law enforcement agency at the full hearing if the complaint is not


available from the law enforcement agency. Failure to provide a


copy of the complaint filed with the law enforcement agency shall


constitute a frivolous filing and the court may assess attorney fees


and court costs against the plaintiff pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection C of this section. The filing of a petition for a


protective order shall not require jurisdiction or venue of the


criminal offense if either the plaintiff or defendant resides in the


county. If a petition has been filed in an action for divorce or


separate maintenance and either party to the action files a petition


for a protective order in the same county where the action for


divorce or separate maintenance is filed, the petition for the

Req. No. 347 Page 2


protective order may be heard by the court hearing the divorce or


separate maintenance action if:


a. there is no established protective order docket in


such court, or


b. the court finds that, in the interest of judicial


economy, both actions may be heard together; provided,


however, the petition for a protective order,


including, but not limited to, a petition in which


children are named as petitioners, shall remain a


separate action and a separate order shall be entered


in the protective order action. Protective orders may


be dismissed in favor of restraining orders in the


divorce or separate maintenance action if the court


specifically finds, upon hearing, that such dismissal


is in the best interests of the parties and does not


compromise the safety of any petitioner.


If the defendant is a minor child, the petition shall be filed


with the court having jurisdiction over juvenile matters.


2. When the abuse occurs when the court is not open for


business, such person may request an emergency temporary order of


protection as authorized by Section 40.3 of this title.


3. A petition for a protective order may include all members of


the residence of the petitioner seeking relief as part of the same


petition.

Req. No. 347 Page 3


B. The petition forms shall be provided by the clerk of the


court. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall develop a


standard form for the petition.


C. 1. Except as otherwise provided by this section, no filing


fee, service of process fee, attorney fees or any other fee or costs


shall be charged the plaintiff or victim at any time for filing a


petition for a protective order whether a protective order is


granted or not granted. The court may assess court costs, service


of process fees, attorney fees, other fees and filing fees against


the defendant at the hearing on the petition, if a protective order


is granted against the defendant; provided, the court shall have


authority to waive the costs and fees if the court finds that the


party does not have the ability to pay the costs and fees.


2. If the court makes specific findings that a petition for a


protective order has been filed frivolously and no victim exists,


the court may assess attorney fees and court costs against the


plaintiff.


D. The person seeking relief shall prepare the petition or, at


the request of the plaintiff, the court clerk or the victim-witness


coordinator, victim support person, and court case manager shall


prepare or assist the plaintiff in preparing the petition.


E. The person seeking a protective order may further request


the exclusive care, possession, or control of any animal owned,


possessed, leased, kept, or held by either the petitioner, defendant

Req. No. 347 Page 4


or minor child residing in the residence of the petitioner or


defendant. The court may order the defendant to make no contact


with the animal and forbid the defendant from taking, transferring,


encumbering, concealing, molesting, attacking, striking,


threatening, harming, or otherwise disposing of the animal.


F. A court may not require the victim to seek legal sanctions


against the defendant including, but not limited to, divorce,


separation, paternity, or criminal proceedings prior to hearing a


petition for protective order.


G. A victim of rape, forcible sodomy, a sex offense,


kidnapping, assault and battery with a deadly weapon, child abuse,


or member of the immediate family of a victim of first-degree


murder, as such terms are defined in Section 40 of this title, may


petition, or have a petition filed on the victim’s behalf if the


victim is a minor, for an emergency temporary order or emergency ex


parte order regardless of any relationship or scenario pursuant to


the provisions of this section. The Administrative Office of the


Courts shall modify the petition forms as necessary to effectuate


the provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.4, as


amended by Section 7, Chapter 318, O.S.L. 2022 (22 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 60.4), is amended to read as follows:


Section 60.4. A. 1. A copy of a petition for a protective


order, any notice of hearing and a copy of any emergency temporary

Req. No. 347 Page 5


order or emergency ex parte order issued by the court shall be


served upon the defendant in the same manner as a bench warrant. In


addition, if the service is to be in another county, the court clerk


may issue service to the sheriff by facsimile or other electronic


transmission for service by the sheriff and receive the return of


service from the sheriff in the same manner. Any fee for service of


a petition for protective order, notice of hearing, and emergency ex


parte order shall only be charged pursuant to subsection C of


Section 60.2 of this title and, if charged, shall be the same as the


sheriff’s service fee plus mileage expenses.


2. Emergency temporary orders, emergency ex parte orders and


notice of hearings shall be given priority for service and can be


served twenty-four (24) hours a day when the location of the


defendant is known. When service cannot be made upon the defendant


by the sheriff, the sheriff may contact another law enforcement


officer or a private investigator or private process server to serve


the defendant.


3. An emergency temporary order, emergency ex parte order, a


petition for protective order, and a notice of hearing shall have


statewide validity and may be transferred to any law enforcement


jurisdiction to effect service upon the defendant. The sheriff may


transmit the document by electronic means.





Req. No. 347 Page 6


4. The return of service shall be submitted to the sheriff’s


office or court clerk in the court where the petition, notice of


hearing or order was issued.


5. When the defendant is a minor child who is ordered removed


from the residence of the victim, in addition to those documents


served upon the defendant, a copy of the petition, notice of hearing


and a copy of any temporary order or ex parte order issued by the


court shall be delivered with the child to the caretaker of the


place where such child is taken pursuant to Section 2-2-101 of Title


10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. 1. Within fourteen (14) days of the filing of the petition


for a protective order, the court shall schedule a full hearing on


the petition, if the court finds sufficient grounds within the scope


of the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act stated in the petition to


hold such a hearing, regardless of whether an emergency temporary


order or ex parte order has been previously issued, requested or


denied. Provided, however, when the defendant is a minor child who


has been removed from the residence pursuant to Section 2-2-101 of


Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes, the court shall schedule a full


hearing on the petition within seventy-two (72) hours, regardless of


whether an emergency temporary order or ex parte order has been


previously issued, requested or denied.


2. The court may schedule a full hearing on the petition for a


protective order within seventy-two (72) hours when the court issues

Req. No. 347 Page 7


an emergency temporary order or ex parte order suspending child


visitation rights due to physical violence or threat of abuse.


3. If service has not been made on the defendant at the time of


the hearing, the court shall, at the request of the petitioner,


issue a new emergency order reflecting a new hearing date and direct


service to issue.


4. A petition for a protective order shall, upon the request of


the petitioner, renew every fourteen (14) days with a new hearing


date assigned until the defendant is served. A petition for a


protective order shall not expire unless the petitioner fails to


appear at the hearing or fails to request a new order. A petitioner


may move to dismiss the petition and emergency or final order at any


time; however, a protective order must be dismissed by court order.


5. Failure to serve the defendant shall not be grounds for


dismissal of a petition or an ex parte order unless the victim


requests dismissal or fails to appear for the hearing thereon.


6. A final protective order shall be granted or denied within


six (6) months of service on the defendant unless all parties agree


that a temporary protective order remain in effect; provided, a


victim shall have the right to request a final protective order


hearing at any time after the passage of six (6) months.


C. 1. At the hearing, the court may impose any terms and


conditions in the protective order that the court reasonably


believes are necessary to bring about the cessation of domestic

Req. No. 347 Page 8


abuse against the victim or stalking or harassment of the victim or


the immediate family of the victim but shall not impose any term and


condition that may compromise the safety of the victim including,


but not limited to, mediation, couples counseling, family


counseling, parenting classes or joint victim-offender counseling


sessions. The court may order the defendant to obtain domestic


abuse counseling or treatment in a program certified by the Attorney


General at the expense of the defendant pursuant to Section 644 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. The court shall consider a defendant’s criminal history in


determining any terms and conditions in the protective order that


the court reasonably believes are necessary to bring about the


cessation of domestic abuse against the victim or stalking or


harassment of the victim or the immediate family of the victim.


3. If the court grants a protective order and the defendant is


a minor child, the court shall order a preliminary inquiry in a


juvenile proceeding to determine whether further court action


pursuant to the Oklahoma Juvenile Code should be taken against a


juvenile defendant.


D. Final protective orders authorized by this section shall be


on a standard form developed by the Administrative Office of the


Courts.


E. 1. After notice and hearing, protective orders authorized


by this section may require the defendant to undergo treatment or

Req. No. 347 Page 9


participate in the court-approved counseling services necessary to


bring about cessation of domestic abuse against the victim pursuant


to Section 644 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes but shall not


order any treatment or counseling that may compromise the safety of


the victim including, but not limited to, mediation, couples


counseling, family counseling, parenting classes or joint victim-


offender counseling sessions.


2. The defendant may be required to pay all or any part of the


cost of such treatment or counseling services. The court shall not


be responsible for such cost.


3. Should the plaintiff choose to undergo treatment or


participate in court-approved counseling services for victims of


domestic abuse, the court may order the defendant to pay all or any


part of the cost of such treatment or counseling services if the


court determines that payment by the defendant is appropriate.


F. When necessary to protect the victim and when authorized by


the court, protective orders granted pursuant to the provisions of


this section may be served upon the defendant by a peace officer,


sheriff, constable, or policeman or other officer whose duty it is


to preserve the peace, as defined by Section 99 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


G. 1. Any protective order issued on or after November 1,


2012, pursuant to subsection C of this section shall be:



Req. No. 347 Page 10


a. for a fixed period not to exceed a period of five (5)


years unless extended, modified, vacated or rescinded


upon motion by either party or if the court approves


any consent agreement entered into by the plaintiff


and defendant; provided, if the defendant is


incarcerated, the protective order shall remain in


full force and effect during the period of


incarceration. The period of incarceration, in any


jurisdiction, shall not be included in the calculation


of the five-year time limitation, or


b. continuous upon a specific finding by the court of one


of the following:


(1) the person has a history of violating the orders


of any court or governmental entity,


(2) the person has previously been convicted of a


violent felony offense,


(3) the person has a previous felony conviction for


stalking as provided in Section 1173 of Title 21


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


(4) a court order for a final Victim Protection Order


has previously been issued against the person in


this state or another state, or





Req. No. 347 Page 11


(5) the victim provides proof that a continuous


protective order is necessary for his or her


protection.


Further, the court may take into consideration whether the person


has a history of domestic violence or a history of other violent


acts. The protective order shall remain in effect until modified,


vacated or rescinded upon motion by either party or if the court


approves any consent agreement entered into by the plaintiff and


defendant. If the defendant is incarcerated, the protective order


shall remain in full force and effect during the period of


incarceration.


2. The court shall notify the parties at the time of the


issuance of the protective order of the duration of the protective


order.


3. Upon the filing of a motion by either party to modify,


extend, or vacate a protective order, a hearing shall be scheduled


and notice given to the parties. At the hearing, the issuing court


may take such action as is necessary under the circumstances.


4. If a child has been removed from the residence of a parent


or custodial adult because of domestic abuse committed by the child,


the parent or custodial adult may refuse the return of such child to


the residence unless, upon further consideration by the court in a


juvenile proceeding, it is determined that the child is no longer a


threat and should be allowed to return to the residence.

Req. No. 347 Page 12


H. 1. It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and


willfully seek a protective order against a spouse or ex-spouse


pursuant to the Protection from Domestic Abuse Act for purposes of


harassment, undue advantage, intimidation, or limitation of child


visitation rights in any divorce proceeding or separation action


without justifiable cause.


2. The violator shall, upon conviction thereof, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a


period not exceeding one (1) year or by a fine not to exceed Five


Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and imprisonment.


3. A second or subsequent conviction under this subsection


shall be a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the


Department of Corrections for a period not to exceed two (2) years,


or by a fine not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by


both such fine and imprisonment.


I. 1. A protective order issued under the Protection from


Domestic Abuse Act shall not in any manner affect title to real


property, purport to grant to the parties a divorce or otherwise


purport to determine the issues between the parties as to child


custody, visitation or visitation schedules, child support or


division of property or any other like relief obtainable pursuant to


Title 43 of the Oklahoma Statutes, except child visitation orders


may be temporarily suspended or modified to protect from threats of


abuse or physical violence by the defendant or a threat to violate a

Req. No. 347 Page 13


custody order. Orders not affecting title may be entered for good


cause found to protect an animal owned by either of the parties or


any child living in the household.


2. When granting any protective order for the protection of a


minor child from violence or threats of abuse, the court shall allow


visitation only under conditions that provide adequate supervision


and protection to the child while maintaining the integrity of a


divorce decree or temporary order.


J. 1. In order to ensure that a petitioner can maintain an


existing wireless telephone number or household utility account, the


court, after providing notice and a hearing, may issue an order


directing a wireless service provider or public utility provider to


transfer the billing responsibility for and rights to the wireless


telephone number or numbers of any minor children in the care of the


petitioning party or household utility account to the petitioner if


the petitioner is not the wireless service or public utility account


holder.


2. The order transferring billing responsibility for and rights


to the wireless telephone number or numbers or household utility


account to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone


number of the account holder, the name and contact information of


the person to whom the telephone number or numbers or household


utility account will be transferred and each telephone number or


household utility to be transferred to that person. The court shall

Req. No. 347 Page 14


ensure that the contact information of the petitioner is not


provided to the account holder in proceedings held under this


subsection.


3. Upon issuance, a copy of the final order of protection shall


be transmitted, either electronically or by certified mail, to the


registered agent of the wireless service provider or public utility


provider listed with the Secretary of State or Corporation


Commission of Oklahoma or electronically to the email address


provided by the wireless service provider or public utility


provider. Such transmittal shall constitute adequate notice for the


wireless service provider or public utility provider.


4. If the wireless service provider or public utility provider


cannot operationally or technically effectuate the order due to


certain circumstances, the wireless service provider or public


utility provider shall notify the petitioner. Such circumstances


shall include, but not be limited to, the following:


a. the account holder has already terminated the account,


b. the differences in network technology prevent the


functionality of a mobile device on the network, or


c. there are geographic or other limitations on network


or service availability.


5. Upon transfer of billing responsibility for and rights to a


wireless telephone number or numbers or household utility account to


the petitioner under the provisions of this subsection by a wireless

Req. No. 347 Page 15


service provider or public utility provider, the petitioner shall


assume all financial responsibility for the transferred wireless


telephone number or numbers or household utility account, monthly


service and utility billing costs and costs for any mobile device


associated with the wireless telephone number or numbers. The


wireless service provider or public utility provider shall have the


right to pursue the original account holder for purposes of


collecting any past due amounts owed to the wireless service


provider or public utility provider.


6. The provisions of this subsection shall not preclude a


wireless service provider or public utility provider from applying


any routine and customary requirements for account establishment to


the petitioner as part of this transfer of billing responsibility


for a household utility account or for a wireless telephone number


or numbers and any mobile devices attached to that number including,


but not limited to, identification, financial information and


customer preferences.


7. The provisions of this subsection shall not affect the


ability of the court to apportion the assets and debts of the


parties as provided for in law or the ability to determine the


temporary use, possession and control of personal property.


8. No cause of action shall lie against any wireless service


provider or public utility provider, its officers, employees or



Req. No. 347 Page 16


agents for actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court


order issued under the provisions of this subsection.


9. As used in this subsection:


a. “wireless service provider” means a provider of


commercial mobile service under Section 332(d) of the


federal Telecommunications Act of 1996,


b. “public utility provider” means every corporation


organized or doing business in this state that owns,


operates or manages any plant or equipment for the


manufacture, production, transmission, transportation,


delivery or furnishing of water, heat or light with


gas or electric current for heat, light or power, for


public use in this state, and


c. “household utility account” shall include utility


services for water, heat, light, power or gas that are


provided by a public utility provider.


K. 1. A court shall not issue any mutual protective orders.


2. If both parties allege domestic abuse by the other party,


the parties shall do so by separate petitions. The court shall


review each petition separately in an individual or a consolidated


hearing and grant or deny each petition on its individual merits.


If the court finds cause to grant both motions, the court shall do


so by separate orders and with specific findings justifying the


issuance of each order.

Req. No. 347 Page 17


3. The court may only consolidate a hearing if:


a. the court makes specific findings that:


(1) sufficient evidence exists of domestic abuse,


stalking, harassment or rape against each party,


and


(2) each party acted primarily as aggressors,


b. the defendant filed a petition with the court for a


protective order no less than three (3) days, not


including weekends or holidays, prior to the first


scheduled full hearing on the petition filed by the


plaintiff, and


c. the defendant had no less than forty-eight (48) hours


of notice prior to the full hearing on the petition


filed by the plaintiff.


L. The court may allow a plaintiff or victim to be accompanied


by a victim support person at court proceedings. A victim support


person shall not make legal arguments; however, a victim support


person who is not a licensed attorney may offer the plaintiff or


victim comfort or support and may remain in close proximity to the


plaintiff or victim.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 60.6, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 60.6. A. Except as otherwise provided by this section,


any person who:

Req. No. 347 Page 18


1. Has been served with an emergency temporary, ex parte or


final protective order or foreign protective order and is in


violation of such protective order, upon conviction, shall be guilty


of a misdemeanor felony and shall be punished by a fine of not more


than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or Two Thousand Dollars


($2,000.00), by a term of imprisonment in the county jail of custody


of the Department of Corrections for not more than one (1) year two


years, or by both such fine and imprisonment; and


2. After a previous conviction of a violation of a protective


order, is convicted of a second or subsequent offense pursuant to


the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of


a felony and shall be punished by a term of imprisonment in the


custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1)


year nor more than three (3) four (4) years, or by a fine of not


less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Ten


Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by both such fine and


imprisonment.


B. 1. Any person who has been served with an emergency


temporary, ex parte or final protective order or foreign protective


order who violates the protective order and causes physical injury


or physical impairment to the plaintiff or to any other person named


in said protective order shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor felony and shall be punished by a term of imprisonment


in the county jail for not less than twenty (20) days nor custody of

Req. No. 347 Page 19


the Department of Corrections for not more than one (1) year two (2)


years. In addition to the term of imprisonment, the person may be


punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).


2. Any person who is convicted of a second or subsequent


violation of a protective order which causes physical injury or


physical impairment to a plaintiff or to any other person named in


the protective order shall be guilty of a felony and shall be


punished by a term of imprisonment in the custody of the Department


of Corrections of not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5)


years six (6) years, or by a fine of not less than Three Thousand


Dollars ($3,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00),


or by both such fine and imprisonment.


3. In determining the term of imprisonment required by this


section, the jury or sentencing judge shall consider the degree of


physical injury or physical impairment to the victim.


4. The provisions of this subsection shall not affect the


applicability of Sections 644, 645, 647 and 652 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


C. The minimum sentence of imprisonment issued pursuant to the


provisions of paragraph 2 of subsection A and paragraph 2 of


subsection B of this section shall not be subject to statutory


provisions for suspended sentences, deferred sentences or probation,


provided the court may subject any remaining penalty under the



Req. No. 347 Page 20


jurisdiction of the court to the statutory provisions for suspended


sentences, deferred sentences or probation.


D. In addition to any other penalty specified by this section,


the court shall require a defendant to undergo the treatment or


participate in the counseling services necessary to bring about the


cessation of domestic abuse against the victim or to bring about the


cessation of stalking or harassment of the victim. For every


conviction of violation of a protective order:


1. The court shall specifically order as a condition of a


suspended sentence or probation that a defendant participate in


counseling or undergo treatment to bring about the cessation of


domestic abuse as specified in paragraph 2 of this subsection;


2. a. The court shall require the defendant to participate


in counseling or undergo treatment for domestic abuse


by an individual licensed practitioner or a domestic


abuse treatment program certified by the Attorney


General. If the defendant is ordered to participate


in a domestic abuse counseling or treatment program,


the order shall require the defendant to attend the


program for a minimum of fifty-two (52) weeks,


complete the program, and be evaluated before and


after attendance of the program by a program counselor


or a private counselor.



Req. No. 347 Page 21


b. A program for anger management, couples counseling, or


family and marital counseling shall not solely qualify


for the counseling or treatment requirement for


domestic abuse pursuant to this subsection. The


counseling may be ordered in addition to counseling


specifically for the treatment of domestic abuse or


per evaluation as set forth below. If, after


sufficient evaluation and attendance at required


counseling sessions, the domestic violence treatment


program or licensed professional determines that the


defendant does not evaluate as a perpetrator of


domestic violence or does evaluate as a perpetrator of


domestic violence and should complete other programs


of treatment simultaneously or prior to domestic


violence treatment, including but not limited to


programs related to the mental health, apparent


substance or alcohol abuse or inability or refusal to


manage anger, the defendant shall be ordered to


complete the counseling as per the recommendations of


the domestic violence treatment program or licensed


professional;


3. a. The court shall set a review hearing no more than one


hundred twenty (120) days after the defendant is


ordered to participate in a domestic abuse counseling

Req. No. 347 Page 22


program or undergo treatment for domestic abuse to


assure the attendance and compliance of the defendant


with the provisions of this subsection and the


domestic abuse counseling or treatment requirements.


b. The court shall set a second review hearing after the


completion of the counseling or treatment to assure


the attendance and compliance of the defendant with


the provisions of this subsection and the domestic


abuse counseling or treatment requirements. The court


may suspend sentencing of the defendant until the


defendant has presented proof to the court of


enrollment in a program of treatment for domestic


abuse by an individual licensed practitioner or a


domestic abuse treatment program certified by the


Attorney General and attendance at weekly sessions of


such program. Such proof shall be presented to the


court by the defendant no later than one hundred


twenty (120) days after the defendant is ordered to


such counseling or treatment. At such time, the court


may complete sentencing, beginning the period of the


sentence from the date that proof of enrollment is


presented to the court, and schedule reviews as


required by subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph


and paragraphs 4 and 5 of this subsection. The court

Req. No. 347 Page 23


shall retain continuing jurisdiction over the


defendant during the course of ordered counseling


through the final review hearing;


4. The court may set subsequent or other review hearings as the


court determines necessary to assure the defendant attends and fully


complies with the provisions of this subsection and the domestic


abuse counseling or treatment requirements;


5. At any review hearing, if the defendant is not


satisfactorily attending individual counseling or a domestic abuse


counseling or treatment program or is not in compliance with any


domestic abuse counseling or treatment requirements, the court may


order the defendant to further or continue counseling, treatment, or


other necessary services. The court may revoke all or any part of a


suspended sentence, deferred sentence, or probation pursuant to


Section 991b of this title and subject the defendant to any or all


remaining portions of the original sentence;


6. At the first review hearing, the court shall require the


defendant to appear in court. Thereafter, for any subsequent review


hearings, the court may accept a report on the progress of the


defendant from individual counseling, domestic abuse counseling, or


the treatment program. There shall be no requirement for the victim


to attend review hearings; and


7. If funding is available, a referee may be appointed and


assigned by the presiding judge of the district court to hear

Req. No. 347 Page 24


designated cases set for review under this subsection. Reasonable


compensation for the referees shall be fixed by the presiding judge.


The referee shall meet the requirements and perform all duties in


the same manner and procedure as set forth in Sections 1-8-103 and


2-2-702 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes pertaining to referees


appointed in juvenile proceedings.


E. Emergency temporary, ex parte and final protective orders


shall include notice of these penalties.


F. When a minor child violates the provisions of any protective


order, the violation shall be heard in a juvenile proceeding and the


court may order the child and the parent or parents of the child to


participate in family counseling services necessary to bring about


the cessation of domestic abuse against the victim and may order


community service hours to be performed in lieu of any fine or


imprisonment authorized by this section.


G. Any district court of this state and any judge thereof shall


be immune from any liability or prosecution for issuing an order


that requires a defendant to:


1. Attend a treatment program for domestic abusers certified by


the Attorney General;


2. Attend counseling or treatment services ordered as part of


any final protective order or for any violation of a protective


order; and



Req. No. 347 Page 25


3. Attend, complete, and be evaluated before and after


attendance by a treatment program for domestic abusers certified by


the Attorney General.


H. At no time, under any proceeding, may a person protected by


a protective order be held to be in violation of that protective


order. Only a defendant against whom a protective order has been


issued may be held to have violated the order.


I. In addition to any other penalty specified by this section,


the court may order a defendant to use an active, real-time, twenty-


four-hour Global Positioning System (GPS) monitoring device as a


condition of a sentence. The court may further order the defendant


to pay costs and expenses related to the GPS device and monitoring.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-347 CN 1/19/2025 5:45:33 AM



















Req. No. 347 Page 26